Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 4. Recovery of Money or Property Illegally Paid or Diverted.

Sec. 37.10.090.
Action by attorney general.

Whenever money, funds, or property of a city, school district, municipal government, or the state are illegally paid or are diverted for an illegal purpose, or paid to a person not authorized by law to receive them, they may be recovered by an action instituted by the attorney general.
When it appears to the attorney general that it is more advantageous to begin or conduct the action with additional counsel, the attorney general may choose and authorize additional counsel to bring the suit in the name of the proper party.

History.

(§ 12-5-1 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 37.10.100.
Costs of action and disposition of amount recovered.

The necessary and reasonable costs of the suit and of the additional counsel shall be advanced by the state, and a sum recovered in the suit shall be deposited in the state treasury.

If the sum recovered as described in (a) of this section belongs to a city, school district, or municipal government, the sum shall be transferred to it, less sums advanced by the state in the suit and not already repaid to it. The Department of Administration may disburse to the city, school district, or municipal corporation the sums belonging to it. The disbursements must be based upon vouchers approved by the attorney general.

History.

(§ 12-5-2 ACLA 1949; am § 19 ch 175 SLA 2004)